Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3,119
Tax Commissioner; certify population of cities and villages.

(1) The Tax Commissioner shall certify the population of cities and villages to be used for purposes of calculations made pursuant to subdivisions (3)(a) and (b) of section 35-1205, subdivision (1) of section 39-2517, and sections 39-2513 and 77-27,139.02. The Tax Commissioner shall transmit copies of such certification to all interested parties upon request.

(2) The Tax Commissioner shall certify the population of each city and village based upon the most recent federal census figures. The Tax Commissioner shall determine the most recent federal census figures for each city and village by using the most recent federal census figures available from (a) the most recent federal decennial census, (b) the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, or (c) the most recent federal census figure of the city or village plus the population of territory annexed as calculated in sections 18-1753 and 18-1754.

(3) The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 1994, LB 1127, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 26;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 33;

Laws 2011, LB383, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 54;

Laws 2021, LB509, § 9.